waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.aff
SFX Q Y 941
SFX Q 0       is              as
SFX Q as      ojo             as
SFX Q s       jam             as
SFX Q as      ąjį             as
SFX Q as      uoju            as
SFX Q s       jame            as
SFX Q as      ieji            [^i]as
SFX Q as      eji             [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tieji           čias
SFX Q as      ųjų             as
SFX Q as      iesiems         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esiems          [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tiesiems        čias
SFX Q as      uosius          as
SFX Q s       isiais          as
SFX Q as      uosiuose        as
SFX Q as      oji             as
SFX Q as      osios           as
SFX Q s       jai             as
SFX Q as      ąją             as
SFX Q as      ąja             as
SFX Q as      ojoje           as
SFX Q as      ojoj            as
SFX Q as      osioms          as
SFX Q as      ąsias           as
SFX Q as      osiomis         as
SFX Q as      osiose          as
SFX Q 0       is              us
SFX Q us      ųjį             us
SFX Q us      iojo            [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iajam           [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iuoju           [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iajame          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žiojo           dus
SFX Q us      žiajam          dus
SFX Q us      žiuoju          dus
SFX Q us      žiajame         dus
SFX Q us      ojo             jus
SFX Q us      ajam            jus
SFX Q s       oju             jus
SFX Q us      ajame           jus
SFX Q tus     čiojo           tus
SFX Q tus     čiajam          tus
SFX Q tus     čiuoju          tus
SFX Q tus     čiajame         tus
SFX Q us      ieji            us
SFX Q us      iesiems         us
SFX Q us      iųjų            [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iuosius         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iaisiais        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iuosiuose       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žiųjų           dus
SFX Q us      žiuosius        dus
SFX Q us      žiaisiais       dus
SFX Q us      žiuosiuose      dus
SFX Q us      ųjų             jus
SFX Q s       osius           jus
SFX Q us      aisiais         jus
SFX Q s       osiuose         jus
SFX Q tus     čiųjų           tus
SFX Q tus     čiuosius        tus
SFX Q tus     čiaisiais       tus
SFX Q tus     čiuosiuose      tus
SFX Q us      ioji            [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iosios          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iajai           [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iąją            [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iąja            [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iojoje          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iojoj           [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žioji           dus
SFX Q us      žiosios         dus
SFX Q us      žiajai          dus
SFX Q us      žiąją           dus
SFX Q us      žiąja           dus
SFX Q us      žiojoje         dus
SFX Q us      žiojoj          dus
SFX Q us      oji             jus
SFX Q us      osios           jus
SFX Q us      ajai            jus
SFX Q us      ąją             jus
SFX Q us      ąja             jus
SFX Q us      ojoje           jus
SFX Q us      ojoj            jus
SFX Q tus     čioji           tus
SFX Q tus     čiosios         tus
SFX Q tus     čiajai          tus
SFX Q tus     čiąją           tus
SFX Q tus     čiąja           tus
SFX Q tus     čiojoje         tus
SFX Q tus     čiojoj          tus
SFX Q us      iosioms         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iąsias          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iosiomis        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iosiose         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žiosioms        dus
SFX Q us      žiąsias         dus
SFX Q us      žiosiomis       dus
SFX Q us      žiosiose        dus
SFX Q us      osioms          jus
SFX Q us      ąsias           jus
SFX Q us      osiomis         jus
SFX Q us      osiose          jus
SFX Q tus     čiosioms        tus
SFX Q tus     čiąsias         tus
SFX Q tus     čiosiomis       tus
SFX Q tus     čiosiose        tus
SFX Q as      esnis           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnio           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniam          [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnį            [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniu           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniame         [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esnis           [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnio           [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniam          [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnį            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniu           [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniame         [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tesnis          čias
SFX Q čias    tesnio          čias
SFX Q čias    tesniam         čias
SFX Q čias    tesnį           čias
SFX Q čias    tesniu          čias
SFX Q čias    tesniame        čias
SFX Q us      esnis           us
SFX Q us      esnio           us
SFX Q us      esniam          us
SFX Q us      esnį            us
SFX Q us      esniu           us
SFX Q us      esniame         us
SFX Q as      esnė            [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnės           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnei           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnę            [^i]as
SFX Q as      esne            [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnėje          [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esnė            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnės           [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnei           [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnę            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esne            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnėje          [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tesnė           čias
SFX Q čias    tesnės          čias
SFX Q čias    tesnei          čias
SFX Q čias    tesnę           čias
SFX Q čias    tesne           čias
SFX Q čias    tesnėje         čias
SFX Q us      esnė            us
SFX Q us      esnės           us
SFX Q us      esnei           us
SFX Q us      esnę            us
SFX Q us      esne            us
SFX Q us      esnėje          us
SFX Q as      esni            [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnių           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniems         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnius          [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniais         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniuose        [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esni            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnių           [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniems         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnius          [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniais         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniuose        [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tesni           čias
SFX Q čias    tesnių          čias
SFX Q čias    tesniems        čias
SFX Q čias    tesnius         čias
SFX Q čias    tesniais        čias
SFX Q čias    tesniuose       čias
SFX Q us      esni            us
SFX Q us      esnių           us
SFX Q us      esniems         us
SFX Q us      esnius          us
SFX Q us      esniais         us
SFX Q us      esniuose        us
SFX Q as      esnėms          [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnes           [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnėmis         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnėse          [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esnėms          [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnes           [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnėmis         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnėse          [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tesnėms         čias
SFX Q čias    tesnes          čias
SFX Q čias    tesnėmis        čias
SFX Q čias    tesnėse         čias
SFX Q us      esnėms          us
SFX Q us      esnes           us
SFX Q us      esnėmis         us
SFX Q us      esnėse          us
SFX Q as      esnysis         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniojo         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniajam        [^i]as
SFX Q as      esnįjį          [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniuoju        [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniajame       [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esnysis         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniojo         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniajam        [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esnįjį          [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniuoju        [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniajame       [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tesnysis        čias
SFX Q čias    tesniojo        čias
SFX Q čias    tesniajam       čias
SFX Q čias    tesnįjį         čias
SFX Q čias    tesniuoju       čias
SFX Q čias    tesniajame      čias
SFX Q us      esnysis         us
SFX Q us      esniojo         us
SFX Q us      esniajam        us
SFX Q us      esnįjį          us
SFX Q us      esniuoju        us
SFX Q us      esniajame       us
SFX Q as      esnioji         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniosios       [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniajai        [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniąją         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniąja         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniojoj        [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniojoje       [^i]as
