waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.dic
absurdiškas/BNQ
aguonuotas/BNQ
aistrus/BNQ
akiuotas/BNQ
akrobatiškas/BNQ
akustiškas/BNQ
aliejingas/BNQ
aluotas/BNQ
ambulatoriškas/BNQ
anekdotiškas/BNQ
ankstus/BNQ
anonimiškas/BNQ
antonimiškas/BNQ
apgamuotas/BNQ
aplaidus/BNQ
apsukas/BNQ
apyvartus/BNQ
archajiškas/BNQ
artistiškas/BNQ
asocialus/BNQ
atgalias/BNQ
atkarus/BNQ
atliekamas/BNQ
atsainus/BNQ
atskiras/BNQ
atviras/BNQ
atžarus/BNQ
auksiškas/BNQ
ausuotas/BNQ
azartiškas/BNQ
aštuonlinkas/BNQ
bajoriškas/BNQ
baltas/BNQ
barningas/BNQ
baudžiaviškas/BNQ
bejėgiškas/BNQ
besaikiškas/BNQ
bevališkas/BNQ
bjaurus/BNQ
blaškus/BNQ
bokštuotas/BNQ
briaunotas/BNQ
brūkšniuotas/BNQ
buolas/BNQ
ceremoningas/BNQ
ciniškas/BNQ
dagiuotas/BNQ
dainiškas/BNQ
daniškas/BNQ
darganas/BNQ
daubotas/BNQ
dažuotas/BNQ
degutuotas/BNQ
derlingas/BNQ
destruktyvus/BNQ
didingas/BNQ
diletantiškas/BNQ
diržingas/BNQ
dokumentalus/BNQ
dovanas/BNQ
draskus/BNQ
dribus/BNQ
drumzlinas/BNQ
družnas/BNQ
drėgmingas/BNQ
dulkinas/BNQ
duobėtas/BNQ
durnas/BNQ
dvasingas/BNQ
dvinytas/BNQ
dygliuotas/BNQ
dėslus/BNQ
džiovus/BNQ
egoistiškas/BNQ
eklektiškas/BNQ
ekstravagantiškas/BNQ
elegiškas/BNQ
enciklopediškas/BNQ
erdvus/BNQ
esmiškas/BNQ
ežeruotas/BNQ
fatalus/BNQ
flegmatiškas/BNQ
gabus/BNQ
gaivalingas/BNQ
galantiškas/BNQ
gamtiškas/BNQ
garbus/BNQ
gatavas/BNQ
gegužėtas/BNQ
geltas/BNQ
geradariškas/BNQ
gigantiškas/BNQ
girdus/BNQ
glaudus/BNQ
globalus/BNQ
gnaibus/BNQ
gotiškas/BNQ
grakštus/BNQ
graudus/BNQ
griausmingas/BNQ
griuvus/BNQ
grubus/BNQ
grįžtamas/BNQ
gumotas/BNQ
gyvas/BNQ
gąslus/BNQ
harmoningas/BNQ
idealus/BNQ
ilgus/BNQ
imunus/BNQ
informatyvus/BNQ
intensyvus/BNQ
irzlus/BNQ
išaugus/BNQ
išganingas/BNQ
iškilmingas/BNQ
išlinkas/BNQ
išradingas/BNQ
ištaigus/BNQ
išvaizdus/BNQ
jaukus/BNQ
jautrus/BNQ
juodas/BNQ
juridiškas/BNQ
kailiniuotas/BNQ
kaitus/BNQ
kalkiuotas/BNQ
kalus/BNQ
kamuoliškas/BNQ
kanoniškas/BNQ
karingas/BNQ
karštas/BNQ
katalikiškas/BNQ
kaupinas/BNQ
keleiviškas/BNQ
kelnėtas/BNQ
kerpėtas/BNQ
keturkampiškas/BNQ
kiaušiniuotas/BNQ
kilniadvasiškas/BNQ
kiniškas/BNQ
kitoniškas/BNQ
klasiškas/BNQ
kliautingas/BNQ
klostėtas/BNQ
knapus/BNQ
koktus/BNQ
komediškas/BNQ
koncentruotas/BNQ
korumpuotas/BNQ
kraujuotas/BNQ
kritus/BNQ
kuklus/BNQ
kvailas/BNQ
kūrybingas/BNQ
laisvas/BNQ
latviškas/BNQ
lemtingas/BNQ
liepsningas/BNQ
lipšnus/BNQ
lotyniškas/BNQ
lytiškas/BNQ
maksimalus/BNQ
marmuriškas/BNQ
mazochistiškas/BNQ
melagiškas/BNQ
meškiškas/BNQ
miltiškas/BNQ
mišlus/BNQ
molėtas/BNQ
murzinas/BNQ
mėšlinas/BNQ
narsus/BNQ
nebūtas/BNQ
nenutrūkstamas/BNQ
neurotoksiškas/BNQ
nirtus/BNQ
nuliekamas/BNQ
nuokampus/BNQ
nuotykingas/BNQ
olandiškas/BNQ
pabiras/BNQ
pagiriotas/BNQ
pakaltinamas/BNQ
palankus/BNQ
paprastas/BNQ
pasagiškas/BNQ
paslankus/BNQ
patiklus/BNQ
paveikus/BNQ
pašlitas/BNQ
pelėkas/BNQ
peršus/BNQ
piktnaudiškas/BNQ
piršingas/BNQ
pleškus/BNQ
plėvėtas/BNQ
pozityvus/BNQ
pramanus/BNQ
pratisas/BNQ
preventyvus/BNQ
priešgynus/BNQ
prisiskaitėliškas/BNQ
proletariškas/BNQ
puikus/BNQ
putlus/BNQ
pūslėtas/BNQ
raišas/BNQ
raudulingas/BNQ
realistiškas/BNQ
reljefiškas/BNQ
riebaluotas/BNQ
rojiškas/BNQ
rusiškas/BNQ
rūgštingas/BNQ
sakinas/BNQ
santūrus/BNQ
savanaudiškas/BNQ
savotiškas/BNQ
sensacingas/BNQ
sidabruotas/BNQ
sinchroniškas/BNQ
skalsus/BNQ
skersas/BNQ
skraistėtas/BNQ
skvarbus/BNQ
slesnus/BNQ
smalsus/BNQ
smulkus/BNQ
socialus/BNQ
specialus/BNQ
sproglus/BNQ
sravus/BNQ
stangus/BNQ
stingus/BNQ
subtilus/BNQ
suoslus/BNQ
svarus/BNQ
sąmojingas/BNQ
taisyklingas/BNQ
tariamas/BNQ
taškuotas/BNQ
tendencingas/BNQ
tikimas/BNQ
tirštas/BNQ
traiškanotas/BNQ
trilinkas/BNQ
trupus/BNQ
tvankus/BNQ
tėkmingas/BNQ
unksmingas/BNQ
urgzlus/BNQ
užkampus/BNQ
vaidybiškas/BNQ
vajus/BNQ
valkus/BNQ
vargus/BNQ
vasariškas/BNQ
veiksnus/BNQ
verksmingas/BNQ
veršingas/BNQ
vienaspalviškas/BNQ
vienuoliškas/BNQ
vilnėtas/BNQ
visagališkas/BNQ
voriškas/BNQ
vėjingas/BNQ
ypatingas/BNQ
ėdamas/BNQ
įkandus/BNQ
įsakus/BNQ
įtampus/BNQ
įvijas/BNQ
šalimas/BNQ
šeimininkiškas/BNQ
šiaudingas/BNQ
širvas/BNQ
šlovingas/BNQ
šuniškas/BNQ
šveplas/BNQ
ūksmėtas/BNQ
žalias/BNQ
želvas/BNQ
žievingas/BNQ
žmogiškas/BNQ
žvairas/BNQ
žvyruotas/BNQ
